District of Columbia statutes.
46-302.03

Initiating and responding tribunal of the District.

Under this chapter, the Family Division may serve as an initiating tribunal to forward proceedings to another state and as a responding tribunal for proceedings initiated in another state.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 203, 42 DCR 6748

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-342.3.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 203 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).